New York, session 2025-2026, S3216.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-uu to read as follows: 3 § 396-uu. Tangible menus. Any restaurant or licensee possessing a 4 retail license for on-premises consumption subject to the provisions of 5 section one hundred six of the alcoholic beverage control law shall, 6 upon the request of a customer, make available a printed or tangible 7 menu communicating essential information about the beverages and food 8 available for sale by such restaurant or licensee. A tangible menu 9 shall include legible signage posted on a wall or in another conspicuous 10 location. Under no circumstances shall the only menu available be 11 accessible exclusively through digital or online means. For the purposes 12 of this section, the terms "restaurant" and "licensee" shall have the 13 same meaning as those terms are defined in section three of the alcohol- 14 ic beverage control law. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 16 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00918-01-5